dictsource/bcj_rules
// translation rules for Bardi
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// Samples

//        _)  a        A       // "a" at the start of a word
//            a (CC    A       // "a" followed by two consonants
//            a (C%    A       // "a" followed by a double consonant (the same letter twice)
//            a (/%    A       // "a" followed by a percent sign
//        %C) a        A       // "a" preceded by a double consonants
//        @@) bi       bI      // "bi" preceded by at least two syllables
//       @@a) bi       bI      // "bi" preceded by at least 2 syllables and following 'a'

//         @) ly (_S2  lI       // "ly", at end of a word with at least one other
                              // syllable, is a suffix pronounced [lI].  Remove
                              // it and retranslate the word.
        
//         _) un (@P2  %Vn      // "un" at the start of a word is an unstressed
                              // prefix pronounced [Vn]

// Conditional rules


// letter groups
// A  any vowel
// C  any consonant
// K  not a vowel (i.e. consonant or word boundary)
.L01 f h l r s v w y z // continuants
.L02 h l r s v w y z   // continuants, not f
.L03 f h r s v w y z   // continuants, not l
.L04 i í e é è         // front vowels
.L05 p t k f s         // sords
.L09 b d g m v l n d z r q // sonors
.L10 a e o             // vocals fortes
.L11 i u               // vocals febles
.L21 p b t d k g       // oclusives
.L22 f v s z           // fricatives
.L23 m n               // nasals
.L24 l ll              // laterals
.L25 r                 // vibrants


.group a
        a          a
        ae         ,aE2  // Evitem la neutralització
        amb (_A     am    // Sensibilització


.group b
        b          b
        b (_       p
     A) b (A       B
    A_) b (A       B
   L02) b (A       B
  L02_) b (A       B


.group c
        c          k
        c (L04     s

.group ç
        ç          s

.group d
        d          d
        d (_       t
     A) d (A       D
    A_) d (A       D
   L03) d (A       D
  L03_) d (A       D
        dj         dZ;
        dv         bb	// Geminació


.group e
        e          E
        ea         E2,a // Evitem la neutralització
        eo         E2,o // Evitem la neutralització

        e (nt_     e


.group f
        f          f

.group g
        g          g
        g (_       k
     A) g (A       Q
    A_) g (A       Q
   L01) g (A       Q
  L01_) g (A       Q
     A) g (rA      Q
        g (L04     Z;
        gu (L04    g   // front vowels
        gui        dZ;i


.group h
        h              // silent
        -) hi (_   'i
        -) ho (_   'U


.group i
        i          i
     A) i (K+      j
    gü) i (K       i
    qü) i (K       i
        i (A       j
        i (a_      i
        i (u       i
     A) ig (_      tS;
     A) ix         S;


.group j
        j          Z;


.group k
        k          k


.group l
        l          l
        ll         l^
     _) l' (P2     l
     -) la (_      la#


.group m
        m          m
     _) m' (P2     m
        mp (K      m
//        ment (_    m'En  // ??


.group n
        n          n
     _) n' (P2     n
        n (_       =n  // unlike Spanish, the vowel is stressed
     e) n (_       n   // except after e, i
     i) n (_       n
        nt (K      n
        nt (_      =n
        ny         n^
     b) n (@       m
     v) n (@       m
     @) n (b       m
     @) n (v       m
        n (cK      N
        ng         N


.group o
        o          o
        or (_      'o*
        ou         Ow


.group p
        p          p
        p (t       p:


.group q
        q          k
        qu (L04    k
        qui        kwi
        qü         kw


.group r
        r          R
     _) r          *R
        r (_       =        // final r is silent, but stress the vowel
        r (t       **
     A) r (A       **
     C) r (A       **
     l) r (A       R
     m) r (A       R
     n) r (A       R
     s) r (A       R
        rr         *R


.group s
        s          s
     _) s' (P2     s
        ss         s
     A) s (A       z
     @) s (_S1     s
     -) se (_      s@


.group t
        t          t
     _) t' (P2     t
        tg (L04    dZ;
        tj         dZ;
        tj (_      tS;
        tx         tS;
        tz         dz
        tm         mm	// Geminació


.group u
        u          u
     A) u (K       w
        u (A       w
        u (i       u
        uu         uw

.group v
        v          B
     _) v          v#


.group w
        w          w


.group x
        x          ks
    _A) x          gz
    _A) x (L05     ks
     K) x          S;
    Ai) x          S;
    Au) x          S;


.group y
        y          i
        y (A       j


.group z
        z          z



.group
        à          ''a   // force stress onto this vowel
        é          ''e
        è          ''E
        í          ''i
        ó          ''o
        ò          ''O
        ú          ''u
        ï          i
        ŀ          l
        ü          u
     g) ü          w
        ñ          n^

        $          dola#*
